Nebraska, session 109, LB647A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $65,087 from the General Fund
for FY2025-26 and (2) $-0- from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the
Department of Revenue, for Program 102, to aid in carrying out the provisions
of Legislative Bill 647, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-